Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 194A.601 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Dementia Services is established within the cabinet. The purpose of the office is to oversee
information and resources related to policy and services affecting residents of Kentucky with dementia, and
the caregivers and families of the residents.
(2) The dementia services coordinator shall be a full-time, permanent employee and shall be responsible for the
staffing and operational details of the office.
(3) The dementia services coordinator shall prepare an annual report on the operations of the office and
council, which shall include but not be limited to a progress update on the implementation of the Kentucky
Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan and any state plan amendments or recommendations. The
report shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission for referral[A report on the operations of
the office shall be made to the secretary within ninety (90) days of June 29, 2021. An annual report on the
operation of the office shall be made] to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services by December 1 of
each year.
(4)[(3)] The duties of the office shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Creating, implementing, and updating the Kentucky Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan;
(b) Coordinating and managing the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Council;
(c) Assessing and analyzing dementia-specific data collected by the cabinet, including the behavioral risk
factor surveillance system, and data from other relevant departments and divisions;
(d) Evaluating of state-funded dementia services;
(e) Identifying and supporting the development of dementia-specific trainings;
(f) Streamlining all applicable state government services to increase efficiency and improve the quality of
care in residential and home and community-based settings;
(g) Identifying any duplicative services to eliminate all unnecessary costs;
(h) Identifying and applying for grant opportunities to expand the scope of services while reducing state
costs; and
(i) Completing other duties relevant to supporting policy development and implementation to support
individuals with dementia and their[ family] caregivers.
Section 2. KRS 194A.603 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Council is created. The council shall report directly
to the office.
(2) The council shall be composed of the following sixteen (16)[fifteen (15)] members:
(a) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her designee;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Aging and Independent Living or his or her designee;
(c) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her designee;
(d) The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services or his or her designee;
(e) The state long-term care ombudsman or his or her designee;
(f) The executive director of the Area Agencies on Aging or his or her designee;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(g) Two (2) unaffiliated individuals who are current or former unpaid caregivers for individuals[One (1)
individual who is the family caregiver of an individual] living with Alzheimer's disease or another
dementia, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any
interested parties;
(h) One (1) individual who represents the residential long-term care industry, appointed by the Governor
from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;
(i) One (1) individual who represents providers of adult day care services, appointed by the Governor from
a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;
(j) One (1) individual who represents the home care providers, appointed by the Governor from a list of
names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;
(k) One (1) individual employed by and representing an organization that advocates solely on behalf of
physicians, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any
interested parties;
(l) One (1) individual employed by and representing an organization that advocates solely on behalf of
nurses, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested
parties;
(m) One (1) individual who conducts research regarding Alzheimer's disease or other dementias, appointed
by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;
(n) One (1) individual who represents an organization that advocates solely on behalf of individuals living
with Alzheimer's disease or other dementias, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of
qualified persons submitted by any interested parties; and
(o) One (1) individual representing a statewide organization that advocates on behalf of Kentuckians aged
fifty (50) or older, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by
any interested parties.
(3) Members who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses.
(4) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other such times as it determines necessary to perform its
duties. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the council's business.
(5) The council shall:
(a) Elect its own chairperson and establish other officers and subcommittees as needed to execute the duties
of the council;
(b) Adopt bylaws and operate under its bylaws;
(c) By December 1, 2029, and by December 1[Starting on July 1, 2021, and repeating] every four (4) years
thereafter[after that date], submit an updated Kentucky Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health
Services[Governor for his or her approval and thereafter make it available to the General Assembly]. If
the council determines that amendments need to be made to the state plan, an amended Kentucky
Alzheimer's and Related Dementia State Plan may be presented to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services[Governor for review and
approval];
(d) Beginning December 1 of each year, develop and implement a year-long initiative that advances a
key area of the Kentucky Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan. The key area to be
addressed each year shall be determined by a vote of the council, unless otherwise provided by law.
Completed initiatives may be reviewed by the council annually. After review, at the discretion of the
council, completed initiatives may be updated as necessary;[Starting on July 1, 2021, and repeating
every year after that date, submit an annual report on the implementation progress of the Kentucky
Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan to the Governor. This annual report shall include a
summary of the progress toward implementation of the state plan and recommendations for
amendments to the state plan;] and
(e) Serve in an advisory capacity to the Governor, the General Assembly, the cabinet and all other state
agencies on matters relating to the Kentucky Alzheimer's and Related Dementias State Plan. The
council shall review and make recommendations regarding progress towards the goals of the state plan

CHAPTER 40 3
and on progress in implementing resources and services to serve individuals with dementia and related
diseases across Kentucky in the future.
(6) Members shall serve for a term of two (2) years and may be reappointed. All subsequent appointments or
reappointments shall be for terms of two (2) years. If an appointee resigns or is otherwise unable to complete
the appointed term, the Governor shall appoint a new individual whose expertise or experience satisfies the
vacated position within ninety (90) days.
Section 3. (1) Beginning December 1, 2026, the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Advisory
Council, with support from the Office of Dementia Services, shall develop and implement a health care provider
toolkit on the early detection and diagnosis of Alzheimer's and related disorders as the initial year-long initiative
required under subsection (5)(d) of Section 2 of this Act. The toolkit shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Validated cognitive assessments, including during annual Medicare wellness visits;
(b) Best practices for person-centered care planning, including but not limited to:
1. The Medicaid care plan billing code for individuals with cognitive impairment; and
2. Referral pathways to community-based services and care planning resources;
(c) Risk factors for Alzheimer's disease and related dementias, including chronic disease;
(d) Risk-reduction strategies, including information on lifestyle interventions to reduce dementia risk;
(e) The importance of early detection and diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease and related dementias;
(f) Continuing education opportunities related to dementia care best practices;
(g) Information on approved diagnostics and treatments; and
(h) Resources for caregivers.
(2) The council shall complete the toolkit by December 1, 2027. The Office of Dementia Services, in
coordination with the Department for Public Health and with support from the council, shall distribute the toolkit
across healthcare sectors, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Managed care organizations;
(b) Academic research institutions:
(c) Federally qualified health centers;
(d) Associations representing hospitals and health systems;
(e) Associations representing physicians and physician assistants;
(f) Associations representing nurses;
(g) Associations representing health care professionals; and
(h) Any other public or private organization, entity, or part of an organization or entity the council deems
necessary.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version